Florida, session 2026, HB735.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (2) of section 633.408, Florida
Statutes, is amended, and subsection (10) is added to that
section, to read:
633.408 Firefighter and volunteer firefighter training and
certification.—
(2) Except as provided in subsection (10), courses under
subsection (1) may only be administered by education or training
providers approved by the division pursuant to s. 633.128(1)(c)
and taught by instructors certified pursuant to s.
633.128(1)(d).
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb735-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 735 2026
(10) If the division determines that another state's
training and certification requirements or examinations are
substantially equivalent or more stringent than those required
under this section or chapter, the division must accept such
substantially similar training and certification for
certification in this state. Before the division may deny a
certificate under this section, the division must make a finding
that the basis certificate in another jurisdiction is or is not
substantially equivalent to or is otherwise insufficient for
certification in this state. As used in this subsection, the
term "basis certificate" means the certificate or training
requirements of another jurisdiction, which are used to meet the
requirements for certification in this state.
Section 2. Paragraph (c) of subsection (7) of section
633.508, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (d), and
a new paragraph (c) is added to that subsection, to read:
633.508 Workplace safety; rulemaking authority; division
authority.—
(7) The division shall adopt rules relating to all of the
following:
(c) Prohibiting firefighter employers from requiring their
firefighter employees to bring their personal protective
equipment or firefighting gear home if such equipment or gear is
contaminated.
Section 3. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (2) of
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb735-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 735 2026
section 633.520, Florida Statutes, to read:
633.520 Safety; firefighter employer responsibilities.—
(2) The division shall adopt rules to establish:
(c) Employers' best practices related to contaminated
personal protective equipment or firefighting gear.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb735-00